05_Project/misc.lexc
! The main morphological differences between LF and SF
! are in verbs and personal pronouns
! e.g. the use of "ils" in the plural regardless of gender
! But I'm focusing on nouns for now because that's easier to start with

Multichar_Symbols

%<adv%>			! Adverb
%<art%>			! Article
%<conj%>		! Conjunction
%<contr%>		! Contraction
%<interj%>		! Interjection
%<prep%>		! Preposition
%<pron%>		! Pronoun
%<dem%>			! DEMONSTRATIVE

%<indef%>		! indefinite
%<def%>			! definite
%<impl%>		! Impersonal
%<dem%>			! DEMONSTRATIVE
%<interr%>		! INTERROGATIVE

%<1p%>			! person
%<2p%>
%<3p%>

%<nom%>			! nominative case
%<acc%>			! direct obj case
%<dat%>			! indirect object
%<refl%>		! reflexive
%<disj%>		! disjunctive

%<sg%>			! singular
%<pl%>			! plural

%<m%>			! masculine
%<f%>			! feminine

%>				! morpheme boundary

LEXICON Root

Adverbs;
Articles;
Conjunctions;
Contractions;
Interjections;
Prepositions;
Pronouns;

! Generate masculine & feminine form of adjectives
LEXICON Adj
%<m%>: Number;
%<f%>: %>e Number;

! Generate singular & plural forms
! of adjectives, nouns, etc.
LEXICON Number
%<sg%>: #;
%<pl%>: %>s #;

! Dictionary considers le the lemma of la
! But here I define them separately
LEXICON Articles

à%<art%>: à #;						! ARTICLE
à%<art%>: au #;
à%<art%>: aux #;

de%<art%>: de #;					! ARTICLE PARTICIPLE? "some, any"
de%<art%>: d' #;

le%<art%>%<def%>%<m%>%<sg%>: le #;	! ARTICLE INDEFINITE "the" M singular
le%<art%>%<def%>%<m%>%<sg%>: l' #;	! variant
le%<art%>%<def%>%<m%>%<pl%>: les #;	! plural

la%<art%>%<def%>%<f%>%<sg%>: la #;	! F singular
la%<art%>%<def%>%<f%>%<sg%>: l' #;	! variant
la%<art%>%<def%>%<f%>%<pl%>: les #;	! plural

un%<art%>%<indef%>%<m%>%<sg%>: un #;
un%<art%>%<indef%>%<m%>%<sg%>: ein #;
un%<art%>%<indef%>%<m%>%<sg%>: eun #;
un%<art%>%<indef%>%<m%>%<pl%>: des #;

une%<art%>%<indef%>%<f%>%<sg%>: une #;
une%<art%>%<indef%>%<f%>%<sg%>: eine #;
une%<art%>%<indef%>%<f%>%<sg%>: einne #;
une%<art%>%<indef%>%<f%>%<sg%>: eunne #;
une%<art%>%<indef%>%<f%>%<pl%>: des #;

LEXICON Conjunctions

comme%<conj%>: comme #;	! CONJUNCTION "like/as"
donc%<conj%>: donc #;	! CONJUNCTION "therefore, so then, hence"
et%<conj%>: et #;		! CONJUNCTION "and"
mais%<conj%>: mais #;	! CONJUNCTION "but"
ou%<conj%>: ou #;		! CONJUNCTION "or"
quand%<conj%>: quand #;	! CONJUNCTION "when"

puis%<conj%>: puis #;	! CONJUNCTION "and"
puis%<conj%>: pis #;
puis%<conj%>: épis #;
puis%<conj%>: épuis #;

que%<conj%>: que #;		! CONJUNCTION "that, than" also qu'
qui%<conj%>: qui #;		! CONJUNCTION "if"
si%<conj%>: si #;		! CONJUNCTION "if"
soit%<conj%>: soit #;	! CONJUNCTION "whether, either"

LEXICON Contractions

c'est%<contr%>: c'est #;		! CONTRACTION "ce est"
c'était%<contr%>: c'était #;	! CONTRACTION "ce était"
des%<contr%>: des #;			! CONTRACTION "de les"
du%<contr%>: du #;				! CONTRACTION "de le"

LEXICON Interjections

ah%<interj%>: ah #;			! INTERJECTION
boy%<interj%>: boy #;		! INTERJECTION "oh boy, wow"
ben%<interj%>: ben #;		! INTERJECTION "well, well then"
hein%<interj%>: hein #;		! INTERJECTION "huh? right? isn't it?"
lord%<interj%>: lord #;		! INTERJECTION "Oh Lord"
monde%<interj%>: monde #;	! INTERJECTION "goodness"
oh%<interj%>: oh #;			! INTERJECTION "oh" also sp. o
oh%<interj%>: o #;			! INTERJECTION variant of "oh"
quoi%<interj%>: quoi #;		! INTERJECTION "what"
well%<interj%>: well #;		! INTERJECTION "well"

!ah huh	! INTERJECTION?

LEXICON Prepositions

à%<prep%>: à #;				! PREPOSITION/ARTICLE
à%<prep%>: au #;
à%<prep%>: aux #;
après%<prep%>: après #;		! PREPOSITION "after, about, at, in the process of"
avant%<prep%>: avant #;		! PREPOSITION "before"
avec%<prep%>: avec #;		! PREPOSITION "with"
chez%<prep%>: chez #;		! PREPOSITION "to, at, at the house of"
côté%<prep%>: côté #;		! PREPOSITION "beside; at the house of; from; toward"
dans%<prep%>: dans #;		! PREPOSITION "in, inside"
de%<prep%>: de #;			! PREPOSITION "of"
de%<prep%>: d' #;
dedans%<prep%>: dedans #;	! PREPOSITION "inside, during"
dehors%<prep%>: dehors #;	! PREPOSITION "off; beside"
depuis%<prep%>: depuis #;	! PREPOSITION "since, from"
dessous%<prep%>: dessous #;	! PREPOSITION "under"
dessus%<prep%>: dessus #;	! PREPOSITION "on"
en%<prep%>: en #;			! PREPOSITION "in"
entre%<prep%>: entre #;		! PREPOSITION "between"
jusque%<prep%>:jusque #;	! PREPOSITION "as far as, until"
jusqu'à%<prep%>:jusqu'à #;	! PREPOSITION "until"
par%<prep%>: par #;			! PREPOSITION "by"
pour%<prep%>: pour #;		! PREPOSITION "for"
sans%<prep%>: sans #;		! PREPOSITION "without"
sous%<prep%>: sous #;		! PREPOSITION "under"
sur%<prep%>: sur #;			! PREPOSITION "on"
